South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3799.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-23-60 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (E) An individual seeking certification pursuant to this section shall undergo a state criminal records check, supported by fingerprints, by the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division (SLED), and a national criminal records check, supported by fingerprints, by the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI). SLED is authorized to retain the fingerprints for certification purposes and for notification of the academy regarding criminal charges.  Both SLED and the FBI may retain the applicant's fingerprints for future submission to the Next Generation Identification (NGI) program and for latent fingerprint searches. The results of these criminal records checks must be reported to the academy and cannot be further disseminated. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----